test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alga_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  
  Noun - algâ:
    algâ+N+Sg+Nom: algâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Gen: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Acc: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Ill: aalgân
    algâ+N+Sg+Loc: aalgâst
    algâ+N+Sg+Com: algáin
    algâ+N+Sg+Abe: aˊlgâttáá
    algâ+N+Ess: algân
    algâ+N+Par: algâd
    algâ+N+Pl+Nom: aalgah
    algâ+N+Pl+Gen: [aalgâi, aˊlgâi]
    algâ+N+Pl+Acc: aalgâid
    algâ+N+Pl+Ill: algáid
    algâ+N+Pl+Loc: aalgâin
    algâ+N+Pl+Com: aˊlgâiguin
    algâ+N+Pl+Abe: aˊlgâittáá


  Noun - robdâ:
    robdâ+N+Sg+Nom: robdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Gen: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Acc: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Ill: roobdân
    robdâ+N+Sg+Loc: roobdâst
    robdâ+N+Sg+Com: robdáin
    robdâ+N+Sg+Abe: roˊbdâttáá
    robdâ+N+Ess: robdân
    robdâ+N+Par: robdâd
    robdâ+N+Pl+Nom: roobdah
    robdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roobdâi, roˊbdâi]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Acc: roobdâid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Ill: robdáid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Loc: roobdâin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Com: roˊbdâiguin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Abe: roˊbdâittáá
